Tennessee, session 114, HB0690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
December 14 of each year is designated as "Hazel Moore Day," to be proclaimed
as such by the governor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0690
000598
- 1 -